Utah statutes.
63H-2-301.   Prioritization of transmission projects.
(1)  The board shall review the location and availability of renewable energy
sources serving electric loads in the state.
(2)  The board shall:
(a)  determine if there is adequate transmission infrastructure and capacity
to bring renewable energy sources to market;
(b)  prioritize transmission projects on the basis of:
(i)  location;
(ii)  supporting potential renewable energy source development;
(iii)  feasibility of development; and
(iv)  economic development factors; and
(c)  provide available funding to develop energy resource plans to provide for
connecting to transmission lines a renewable energy source, including
development of an integrated resource plan.
